Washington statutes.
RCW 43.163.130

Nonrecourse revenue bonds—Issuance.

(1) The authority may issue its nonrecourse revenue bonds in order to obtain the funds to carry out the programs authorized in this chapter. The bonds must be special obligations of the authority, payable solely out of the special fund or funds established by the authority for their repayment.

(2) Any bonds issued under this chapter may be secured by a financing document between the authority and the purchasers or owners of such bonds or between the authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the state.

(a) The financing document may pledge or assign, in whole or in part, the revenues and funds held or to be received by the authority, any present or future contract or other rights to receive the same, and the proceeds thereof.

(b) The financing document may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights, security, and remedies of bondowners as may be reasonable and proper, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, provisions defining defaults and providing for remedies in the event of default which may include the acceleration of maturities, restrictions on the individual rights of action by bondowners, and covenants setting forth duties of and limitations on the authority in conduct of its programs and the management of its property.

(c) In addition to other security provided in this chapter or otherwise by law, bonds issued by the authority may be secured, in whole or in part, by financial guaranties, by insurance or by letters of credit issued to the authority or a trustee or any other person, by any bank, trust company, insurance or surety company or other financial institution, within or without the state. The authority may pledge or assign, in whole or in part, the revenues and funds held or to be received by the authority, any present or future contract or other rights to receive the same, and the proceeds thereof, as security for such guaranties or insurance or for the reimbursement by the authority to any issuer of such letter of credit of any payments made under such letter of credit.

(3) Without limiting the powers of the authority contained in this chapter, in connection with each issue of its obligation bonds, the authority must create and establish one or more special funds, including, but not limited to debt service and sinking funds, reserve funds, project funds, and such other special funds as the authority deems necessary, useful, or convenient.

(4) Any security interest created against the unexpended bond proceeds and against the special funds created by the authority is immediately valid and binding against the money and any securities in which the money may be invested without authority or trustee possession. The security interest must be prior to any party having any competing claim against the moneys or securities, without filing or recording under Article 9A of the Uniform Commercial Code, Title 62A RCW, and regardless of whether the party has notice of the security interest.

(5) The bonds may be issued as serial bonds, term bonds or any other type of bond instrument consistent with the provisions of this chapter. The bonds shall bear such date or dates; mature at such time or times; bear interest at such rate or rates, either fixed or variable; be payable at such time or times; be in such denominations; be in such form; bear such privileges of transferability, exchangeability, and interchangeability; be subject to such terms of redemption; and be sold at public or private sale, in such manner, at such time or times, and at such price or prices as the authority determines. The bonds must be executed by the manual or facsimile signatures of the authority's chair and either its secretary or executive director, and may be authenticated by the trustee (if the authority determines to use a trustee) or any registrar which may be designated for the bonds by the authority.

(6) Bonds may be issued by the authority to refund other outstanding authority bonds, at or prior to maturity of, and to pay any redemption premium on, the outstanding bonds. Bonds issued for refunding purposes may be combined with bonds issued for the financing or refinancing of new projects. Pending the application of the proceeds of the refunding bonds to the redemption of the bonds to be redeemed, the authority may enter into an agreement or agreements with a corporate trustee regarding the interim investment of the proceeds and the application of the proceeds and the earnings on the proceeds to the payment of the principal of and interest on, and the redemption of, the bonds to be redeemed.

(7) The bonds of the authority may be negotiable instruments under Title 62A RCW.

(8) Neither the members of the authority, nor its employees or agents, nor any person executing the bonds is personally liable on the bonds or be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance of the bonds.

(9) The authority may purchase its bonds with any of its funds available for the purchase. The authority may hold, pledge, cancel or resell the bonds subject to and in accordance with agreements with bondowners.

(10) The authority may not exceed one billion five hundred million dollars in total outstanding debt at any time.

(11) The state finance committee must be notified in advance of the issuance of bonds by the authority in order to promote the orderly offering of obligations in the financial markets.

[ 2011 c 176 s 1; 2005 c 137 s 1. Prior: 2001 c 304 s 2; 2001 c 32 s 2; 1998 c 48 s 1; 1994 c 238 s 5; 1989 c 279 s 14.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2001 c 304: See note following RCW 43.163.090.

Effective date—2001 c 32: See note following RCW 62A.9A-102.

Severability—Effective date—1994 c 238: See notes following RCW 43.163.010.

Bonds to finance conservation measures: RCW 43.19.695.